Illinois, session 104th, SB314.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Physical Fitness Services Act is amended by 5adding Section 7.5 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 645/7.5 new)7    Sec. 7.5. Advertising and contract requirements for 8lifetime memberships.9    (a) As used in this Section, "lifetime membership" means a 10membership advertised or represented by a physical fitness 11center as a membership to that physical fitness center that 12lasts for the duration of the life of the customer unless 13canceled by the customer.14    (b) A physical fitness center shall not offer or advertise 15a lifetime membership that violates subsection (c) of Section 168.17    (c) A physical fitness center shall clearly and 18conspicuously disclose any change in the customer's total 19payment obligations or reduction in benefits no later than 60 20days before the automatic renewal of a contract.21    (d) A physical fitness center shall provide a copy of a 22contract for services to the customer upon the request of the 23customer.